Connecticut, session 2026, SB00134.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 32-75d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) There [is] are established [an] two airport development [zone,]
zones:
(1) One of which is comprised of the following census blocks as
assigned on October 1, 2011, in the towns of Windsor Locks, Suffield,
East Granby and Windsor:
090034701001022, 090034701003000, 090034701003001,
090034701003002, 090034701003003, 090034701003004,
090034701003005, 090034701003017, 090034701003018,
090034701003019, 090034701003020, 090034701003021,
090034701003025, 090034701003026, 090034735022009,
090034735022010, 090034735022011, 090034735022012,
090034735022013, 090034735025004, 090034735027000,
090034735029000, 090034735029001, 090034735029002,
090034735029003, 090034735029004, 090034735029006,
090034761009000, 090034761009010, 090034761009011,
090034761009012, 090034761009013, 090034762001023,

Senate Bill No. 134
090034762001025, 090034762002009, 090034762002013,
090034763003004, 090034763009000, 090034763009001,
090034763009002, 090034763009003, 090034763009004,
090034763009005, 090034763009006, 090034763009007,
090034763009008, 090034763009009, 090034763009010,
090034763009011, 090034763009012, 090034763009013,
090034763009014, 090034763009015, 090034763009016,
090034763009017, 090034763009018, 090034763009020,
090034763009021, 090034763009022, 090034763009023,
090034763009024, 090034763009025, 090034763009026,
090034763009031, 090034763009033, 090034771014005,
090034771014011, 090034771014012, 090034771014013,
090034771014014, 090034771014017, 090034771014018,
090034771014019, 090034771014020, 090034771023025,
090034771023026, 090034771023027, 090034771023036,
090034701003006, 090034701003022, 090034701003023,
090034701005000, 090034761001039, 090034763009028.
(2) One of which is comprised of the following census blocks as
determined in accordance with the 2020 federal decennial census, in the
town of Plainville:
090034204001000, 090034204001001, 090034204001006,
090034204001009, 090034204001010, 090034206021000,
090034206021005, 090034206021006, 090034206021013.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 27, 2026
Public Act No. 26-104 2 of 2